hr-HR: Razine svjetline: Visoka; Niska; Srednja; Iznimno svijetla; Ostalo
lt-LT: Šviesumo lygiai: Didelis; Mažas; Vidutinis; Itin ryškus; Kita
bg-BG: Нива на яркост: Висока; Ниска; Средна; Супер ярка; Други
sv: Ljusstyrkenivåer: Hög; Låg; Medium; Superljus; Övrigt
el: Επίπεδα φωτεινότητας: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μέση; Ιδιαίτερα φωτεινή; Άλλο
sk-SK: Úrovne jasu: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Super svetlý; Iné
ja: 明るさレベル: 高; 低; 媒体; スーパーブライト; その他
tr: Parlaklık Seviyeleri: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Süper parlak; Diğer
th: ระดับความสว่าง: เอวสูง; ต่ำ; สื่อ; สว่างมาก; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Níveis de brilho: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Superalta; Outro
zh-CN: 亮度水平: 高; 低; 媒介; 超亮; 其他
cs: Úrovně jasu: Vysoký; Nízký; Médium; Super světlá; Jiné
da: Lysstyrkeniveauer: Høj; Lav; Medium; Super lyst; Andet
pt-BR: Níveis de brilho: Alta; Baixa; Médio; Super brilhante; Outro
pl: Poziomy jasności: Wysoki; Niski; Środek; Bardzo jasny; Inne
es: Niveles de brillo: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Superbrillante; Otros
hu: Fényerőszintek: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Szuper fényes; Egyéb
nb: Lysstyrkenivåer: Høy; Lav; Middels; Superlys; Annet
nl: Helderheidsniveaus: Hoog; Laag; Medium; Super helder; Andere
fi: Kirkkaustasot: Korkea; Matala; Keskimääräinen; Superkirkas; Muu
vi: Mức độ sáng: Cao; Trễ; Vừa; Siêu sáng; Khác
it: Livelli di luminosità: Alto; Basso; Medium; Super luminoso; Altro
en: Brightness levels: High; Low; Medium; Super bright; Other
ko: 밝기 수준: 높음; 낮음; 매체; 매우 밝음; 기타
de: Helligkeitsstufen: Hoch; Niedrig; Medium; Superhell; Sonstiges
fr: Niveaux d’intensité: Haute; Basse; Moyen; super brillant; Autre
sl-SI: Ravni svetlosti: Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Super svetlo; Drugo
zh-TW: 亮度等級: 高; 低; 媒介; 超亮; 其他
ro-RO: Niveluri luminozitate: Ridicat; Redus; Mediu; Super luminos; Altele
ru: Уровень яркости: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Очень яркий; Другой